Maryland, session 2026, HB0203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–103.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Commissioner may conduct
an investigation to determine whether a provision of this title has been violated on the
Commissioner’s own initiative or may require a written complaint.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0203*

HOUSE BILL 203
(e) (7) THE COMMISSIONER MAY INVESTIGATE WHETHER § 3–718 OF
THIS TITLE HAS BEEN VIOLATED ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN COMPLAINT OF AN
EMPLOYEE.
3–718.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “TRAINING REPAYMENT AGREEMENT” MEANS
AN AGREEMENT THAT REQUIRES AN EMPLOYEE TO PAY AN EMPLOYER OR A THIRD
PARTY, SUCH AS A TRAINING PROVIDER, A SUM OF MONEY IF THE EMPLOYEE
VOLUNTARILY OR INVOLUNTARILY LEAVES EMPLOYMENT WITH THE EMPLOYER.
(2) “TRAINING REPAYMENT AGREEMENT” INCLUDES AN AGREEMENT
THAT REQUIRES THE EMPLOYEE TO REIMBURSE THE EMPLOYER OR THIRD PARTY
FOR TRAINING PREVIOUSLY PROVIDED TO THE EMPLOYEE.
(3) “TRAINING REPAYMENT AGREEMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A CASH ADVANCE TO AN EMPLOYEE;
(II) A PAYMENT FOR EQUIPMENT SOLD OR LEASED TO AN
EMPLOYEE;
(III) AN EDUCATIONAL SABBATICAL LEAVE CONTRACT; OR
(IV) AN AGREEMENT DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION ENTERED INTO AS PART OF A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT.
(B) (1) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT REQUIRE AS A CONDITION OF
EMPLOYMENT AN EMPLOYEE OR PROSPECTIVE EMPLOYEE TO ENTER INTO A
TRAINING REPAYMENT AGREEMENT.
(2) AN AGREEMENT THAT CONSTITUTES A TRAINING REPAYMENT
AGREEMENT IS NULL AND VOID AS BEING AGAINST THE PUBLIC POLICY OF THE
STATE.
(C) IF AN EMPLOYEE OR A PROSPECTIVE EMPLOYEE BELIEVES THAT AN
EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE EMPLOYEE OR
PROSPECTIVE EMPLOYEE MAY:
(1) FILE A WRITTEN COMPLAINT WITH THE COMMISSIONER; OR
(2) BRING A CIVIL ACTION FOR ECONOMIC DAMAGES.

HOUSE BILL 203 3
(D) (1) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT AN EMPLOYER
KNOWINGLY VIOLATED SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER
SHALL ASSESS A CIVIL PENALTY OF:
(I) FOR THE FIRST VIOLATION, UP TO $10,000;
(II) FOR THE SECOND VIOLATION, UP TO $20,000; AND
(III) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, UP TO $20,000 FOR
EACH EMPLOYEE FOR WHOM THE EMPLOYER IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE.
(2) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF THE PENALTY UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE GRAVITY OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) THE SIZE OF THE EMPLOYER’S BUSINESS;
(III) THE EMPLOYER’S GOOD FAITH; AND
(IV) THE EMPLOYER’S HISTORY OF VIOLATIONS UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(3) IF THE COMMISSIONER ASSESSES A PENALTY UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PENALTY SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE NOTICE AND
HEARING REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
(E) IF A COURT IN AN ACTION FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS
SECTION DETERMINES THAT AN INDIVIDUAL OR A CLASS OF INDIVIDUALS IS
ENTITLED TO RESTITUTION AS A RESULT OF THE EMPLOYER’S VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT:
(1) SHALL AWARD EACH INDIVIDUAL ANY RESTITUTION TO WHICH
THE INDIVIDUAL MAY BE ENTITLED; AND
(2) MAY AWARD EACH INDIVIDUAL AN ADDITIONAL AMOUNT UP TO
THREE TIMES THE AMOUNT OF THE RESTITUTION AWARDED.
(F) A PENALTY ISSUED OR RESTITUTION ORDERED UNDER THIS SECTION
AGAINST AN EMPLOYER SHALL BE IN EFFECT AGAINST ANY SUCCESSOR BUSINESS
ENTITY THAT:

HOUSE BILL 203
(1) HAS ONE OR MORE OF THE SAME PRINCIPALS OR OFFICERS AS THE
EMPLOYER AGAINST WHOM THE PENALTY WAS ASSESSED, UNLESS THE PRINCIPAL
OR OFFICER DID NOT OR WITH THE EXERCISE OF REASONABLE DILIGENCE COULD
NOT KNOW OF THE VIOLATION FOR WHICH THE PENALTY WAS IMPOSED; AND
(2) IS ENGAGED IN THE SAME OR EQUIVALENT TRADE OR ACTIVITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.